District of Columbia statutes.
19-101.01

Applicable law.

Sections 19-101.01 to 19-101.06 apply to the estate of a decedent who dies domiciled in the District of Columbia. Rights to homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance for a decedent who dies not domiciled in the District of Columbia are governed by the law of the decedent’s domicile at death.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 801(c), 48 DCR 2087
This section is referenced in § 19-101.06.